Louisiana, session 2026, SB165.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:4757, 4758.1(A)(2) and (B), and 4759(3), (5)(a), and (9) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 9:4759.1 and 4759.2 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4757. Definitions
As used in this Part, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Default" means the failure by the lessee to perform, on time, any
obligation or duty set forth in the rental agreement or pursuant to this Part.
(2) "Electronic mail" means an electronic message that is transmitted between
two or more telecommunications devices, computers, or electronic devices capable
of receiving electronic messages, whether or not the message is converted to printed
format after receipt or is viewed upon transmission or stored for later retrieval.
"Electronic mail" includes electronic messages that are transmitted through a local,
regional, or global computer network.
(2)(3) "Electronic mail address" means a destination, commonly expressed
as a string of characters, to which electronic mail can be sent or delivered. An
"electronic mail address" may include a user name or mailbox and a reference to an
Internet domain.
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 165 ENROLLED
(3)(4) "Last known address" means the mailing address or the electronic mail
address provided by the lessee in the latest rental agreement or, subject to any
requirements in the rental agreement, the mailing address or the electronic mail
address provided by the lessee in a subsequent written notice of a change of address.
(4)(5) "Lessee" means a person, his sublessee, successor, or assign, entitled
to the use of storage space at a self-service storage facility under a rental agreement,
to the exclusion of others.
(5)(6) "Owner" means the owner, operator, lessor, or sublessor of a
self-service storage facility, his agent, or any other person authorized by him to
manage the facility or to receive rent from a lessee under a rental agreement.
(6)(7) "Rental agreement" means any agreement or lease, written or oral,
entered into between the owner and a lessee, that establishes or modifies the terms,
conditions, rules, or any other provisions concerning the use of self-service storage
facility. The rental agreement may be delivered and accepted electronically.
(7)(8) "Self-service storage facility" means any real property designed and
used for the purpose of renting or leasing individual storage space to lessees who are
to have access to such for the purpose of storing and removing movable property. No
lessee shall use a self-service storage facility for residential purposes. A self-service
storage facility shall not be considered as a warehouse subject to the provisions of
Title 10 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950; however, if an owner issues any
warehouse receipt, bill of lading, or other document of title for the movable property
stored, the owner and the lessees shall be subject to the provisions of Title 10 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 and the provisions of this Part shall not apply.
(8)(9) "Verified mail" means any method of mailing that is offered by the
United States Postal Service or a private delivery service that provides evidence of
mailing.
(9)(10) "Wireless telecommunications device" means a cellular telephone,
a text messaging device, a personal digital assistant, a stand-alone computer, or any
other substantially similar wireless device.
* * *
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 165 ENROLLED
§4758.1. Notice of privilege
A. A lessee shall be notified of the privilege created by this Part before
enforcement of the privilege by an owner. Notification of the privilege created by
this Part shall be satisfied by either of the following:
* * *
(2) A written notification of the privilege sent to the lessee by verified mail
to the last known address of the lessee, by electronic mail to a primary and secondary
email address of the lessee, and by text message to the wireless telecommunications
device of the lessee provided the email addresses and number of the wireless
telecommunications device are listed in the rental agreement and by electronic mail
to the email address provided by the lessee and listed in the rental agreement.
B. An owner who does not have a written rental agreement that includes a
notice of the privilege created by this Part shall not initiate an enforcement action as
provided in this Part until thirty days after the written notice of a privilege is mailed
sent to the lessee as required by Paragraph (A)(2) of this Section.
* * *
§4759. Options of owner upon lessee's default
In the event of default by the lessee, the owner of a self-service storage
facility has the option to enforce judicially all of his rights under the rental
agreement, including, if the agreement so provides, his right to accelerate all rentals
that will become due in the future for the full term of the lease or to cancel the lease
and enforce his privilege for the debt due him, as follows:
* * *
(3) The notice shall be delivered in person to the lessee or sent by verified
mail to the last known address of the lessee, by electronic mail to a primary and
secondary email address of the lessee, and by text message to a wireless
telecommunications device provided the email addresses and number of the wireless
telecommunications device are listed by the lessee in the rental agreement and by
electronic mail to the email address provided by the lessee and listed in the
rental agreement.
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 165 ENROLLED
* * *
(5)(a) Actual receipt of the notice made pursuant to this Section shall not be
required. At least ten days after its mailing, or at least ten days after the date that
payment is demanded, whichever is later, an advertisement of the sale or other
disposition of movable property subject to the privilege shall on at least one occasion
be published in a newspaper of general circulation where the self-service storage
facility is located or on a publicly accessible website that regularly advertises or
conducts personal property auctions or sales.
* * *
(9) If the property upon which the lien is claimed is a motor vehicle,
watercraft, or trailer, and rent and other charges remain unpaid for sixty days and the
lessee is in default for sixty days, the owner may have the property towed in lieu
of foreclosing on the lien. If a motor vehicle, watercraft, or trailer is towed pursuant
to the provisions of this Paragraph, the owner shall not be liable for the motor
vehicle, watercraft, or trailer or for any damages to the motor vehicle, watercraft, or
trailer once the tower takes possession of the property. Any tower shall be licensed
pursuant to the Louisiana Towing and Storage Act, R.S. 32:1711 et seq.
* * *
§4759.1. Termination of rental agreement
A. An owner may terminate a rental agreement in accordance with the
provisions of the rental agreement or as authorized by law by delivering to the
lessee a written notice of termination. The notice shall include all of the
following information:
(1) The lessee shall have fifteen days after the date of delivery of the
notice as provided by this Subsection to remove all personal property from the
self-service storage facility.
(2) The owner may limit access to the self-service storage facility to the
owner's posted business hours.
(3) Failure of the lessee to remove all personal property as provided by
this Subsection shall constitute a default of the rental agreement by the lessee.
Page 4 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 165 ENROLLED
B. Upon default of the lessee as provided in Subsection A of this Section,
the owner may assert a lien privilege on any personal property remaining at the
self-service storage facility and may enforce the lien by sale or public auction
in accordance with this Part, except the requirement to advertise in accordance
with this Part shall not apply.
§4759.2. Nonrenewal of rental agreement; abandonment
A. If the owner provides written notice to the lessee that the rental
agreement shall not be renewed upon expiration of its term, the lessee shall
remove all personal property from the self-service storage facility on or before
the date of expiration of the rental agreement.
B. Any personal property remaining at the self-service storage facility
fifteen days after expiration of the rental agreement shall be deemed
abandoned. Upon determination that the storage space is abandoned, the owner
shall have the right to dispose of the personal property without further notice
to the lessee.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.